Washington statutes.
RCW 41.28.140

Retirement for disability.

Any member while in city service may be retired by the board of administration for permanent and total disability, either ordinary or accidental, upon examination, as follows:

(1) Any member who has not attained the age of sixty-five years and who has at least ten years of city service as defined in this chapter, to his or her credit: PROVIDED, That the required ten years of city service shall have been credited to the member over a period of not to exceed fifteen years immediately preceding retirement, within three months after the discontinuance of city service, or while physically or mentally incapacitated for the performance of duty, if such incapacity has been continuous from discontinuance of city service, shall be examined by a physician or surgeon, appointed by the board of administration upon the application of the head of the office or department in which said member is employed, or upon application of said member, or a person acting in his or her behalf, stating that said member is permanently and totally incapacitated, either physically or mentally, for the performance of duty and ought to be retired. If such medical examination shows, to the satisfaction of the board, that the said member is permanently and totally incapacitated either physically or mentally for the performance of duty and ought to be retired, the board shall retire the said member for disability forthwith.

(2) The board shall secure such medical services and advice as it may deem necessary to carry out the purpose of this section and of RCW 41.28.160, and shall pay for such medical services and advice such compensation as the board shall deem reasonable.

[ 2012 c 117 s 51; 1939 c 207 s 15; RRS s 9592-115.]